Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8507
Health care facility; duties.

A health care facility licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act that receives reimbursement under the Nebraska Telehealth Act for telehealth consultations shall establish quality of care protocols and patient confidentiality guidelines to ensure that such consultations meet the requirements of the act and acceptable patient care standards.

Laws 1999, LB 559, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 147.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.